District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.09

NMLS information challenge process.

The Commissioner shall establish by rule a process whereby applicants, licensees, and registrants may challenge information entered into the NMLS by the Commissioner.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 10, 61 DCR 12577